Alabama, session 2026rs, HB122.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 16-13-334 of the Code of Alabama
1975, is amended to read as follows:
"§16-13-334
(a) A participating teacher shall be offered a
preliminary or advanced contract under the provisions of this
article.
(b) 1.(1) A participating teacher not meeting the
criteria for an advanced contract as provided in subsection
(c) shall be offered a preliminary contract if this is his or
her initial contract in the TEAMS program. The preliminary
one-year contract may be extended from year to year for a
maximum of three total years until the teacher qualifies for
an advanced contract which may be up to three years as
provided by this section, or is nonrenewed or terminated under
this article. Each preliminary contract shall include a
provision to ensure a participating teacher’'s adequate
progress toward advanced contract qualification.
Page 1

progress toward advanced contract qualification.
HB122 Enrolled
2.(2) Notwithstanding subparagraph 1. subdivision (1),
a participating teacher with insufficient experience to obtain
the specialized certification or credential provided by
subsection (c) may have his or her preliminary contract
extended from year to year for a maximum of six total years.
3.(3) Subject to limited waivers approved by the
department, a participating teacher shall only be eligible for
preliminary contracts for his or her maximum period of three
or six years. A superintendent, on behalf of a participating
teacher, may request additional program opt-in waivers for the
teacher's failure to timely qualify for an advanced contract
due to limited status exemptions approved by the department,
including, but not limited to, health conditions, family
emergency, or change in county of residence.
(c) To be eligible for an advanced contract, of up to
three years, a participating teacher shall hold a valid
specialized certification or credential provided by subsection
(d).
(d) A participating teacher shall have obtained a
specialized certification or credential issued by one of the
following within three years of admission to the program:
1.(1) The National Institute for STEM Education.
2.(2) The National Board of Professional Teacher
Standards - Early Adolescence or Early Adolescence and Young
Adulthood Math or Science.
3.(3) The department.
4.(4) Any other criteria established by the department.
(e) A participating teacher with over 20 years of
Page 2

(e) A participating teacher with over 20 years of
HB122 Enrolled
service that satisfies the advanced contract criteria shall be
offered a contract for a period of five years.Beginning
October 1, 2026, no contract shall be executed pursuant to
this section for a term longer than provided in (b) or (c);
provided however, any contract executed pursuant to this
section before October, 1 2026 shall be not terminated due to
this provision.
(f) Each contract shall require a participating teacher
to complete at least four days of annual high quality
professional development administered, sponsored, or approved
by the department.
(g) Any provision of law to the contrary
notwithstanding, individuals employed in this program shall be
employed by a local board utilizing contracts as provided by
this article.
1.(1) Any teacher who has attained continuing service
status with his or her local board, and elects participation
in the program under the same local board, shall be deemed to
have voluntarily relinquished his or her status and
protections under the Students First Act of 2011, Chapter 24C.
2.(2) Notwithstanding subparagraph 1. subdivision (1),
any teacher who has attained continuing service status with
his or her local board as of June 30, 2021, and elects
participation in the program under the same local board and
maintains adequate progress toward the advanced contract
qualifications, but fails to obtain the credential or
certification, shall have one-time reversion rights to the
previous service status at the end of his or her preliminary
Page 3

previous service status at the end of his or her preliminary
HB122 Enrolled
contract period or periods.
3.(3) Nothing in this article shall be construed to
confer continuing service status on any participating teacher.
The contract term for a participating teacher shall not count
toward accrual of continuing service status."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 4

1, 2026.
HB122 Enrolled








100
101
102 ________________________________________________
103 Speaker of the House of Representatives
104
105
106
107 ________________________________________________
108 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
109
110
111 House of Representatives
112
113 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
114 was passed by the House 29-Jan-26.
115
116 John Treadwell
117 Clerk
118
119
120
121
122
123 Senate 10-Mar-26 Passed
124
125
126
Page 5